Arkansas, session 2025, SB353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-14-102(a)(1)(A), concerning the date of
the annual school election, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) The annual school election shall be held in each school district
of the state:
(i) In even-numbered years, on the date of the:
(a) Preferential primary election; or
(b) General election; and
(ii) In odd-numbered years, on the:
(a) Second Tuesday in November; or
(b) Second Tuesday in May First Tuesday after
the first Monday in March.
*SSS199*
03-12-2025 10:10:46 SSS199

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/12/25 SB353

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-14-111(k), concerning candidate filing
procedures for school elections, is amended to read as follows:
(k) The order in which the names of the respective candidates are to
appear on the ballot shall be determined by lot at the public meeting of the
county board of election commissioners held not later than:
(1) The deadline to conduct the ballot draw for the preferential
primary or general election for an annual school election held in even-
numbered years; and
(2) The seventh day of March for Eighty-nine (89) days before an
annual school election held on the second first Tuesday after the first
Monday in May March of an odd-numbered year; and
(3) Seventy-two (72) days before an annual school election held
on the second Tuesday of November of an odd-numbered year.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-7-203(a) and (b), concerning the dates of
the general primary election and preferential primary election, are amended
to read as follows:
(a) The general primary election shall be held:
(1) For years in which the office of Governor will appear on the
ballot at the general election, on the third Tuesday in June preceding the
general election; and
(2) For years in which the office of President of the United
States will appear on the ballot at the general election, on the Tuesday four
(4) weeks following the preferential primary election.
(b) The preferential primary election shall be held:
(1) For years in which the office of Governor will appear on the
ballot at the general election, on the Tuesday four (4) weeks before the
general primary election; and
(2) For years in which the office of President of the United
States will appear on the ballot at the general election, on the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in March.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-7-203(c)(1), concerning the dates of the
general primary election and preferential primary election, is amended to
read as follows:
03-12-2025 10:10:46 SSS199

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/12/25 SB353
(c)(1) The party filing period shall be a one-week period beginning
and ending on the following dates and times:
(A) For years in which the office of Governor will appear
on the ballot at the general election, beginning at 12:00 noon one (1) week
prior to the first day in March and ending at 12:00 noon on the second day in
March; and
(B) For years in which the office of President of the
United States will appear on the ballot at the general election, beginning at
12:00 noon on the first Monday in November preceding the general primary
election and ending at 12:00 noon on the eighth day thereafter.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 7-7-304(a)(1), concerning the names to be
included on the ballots in a preferential primary, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) The Secretary of State shall certify to all county boards of
election commissioners full lists of the names of all candidates who have
filed party certificates with him or her to be placed on the ballots in their
respective counties at the preferential primary election not less than:
(A) Seventy-five (75) days before a preferential primary
election that is held in May under § 7-7-203; and
(B) Ninety-two ninety-two (92) days before a preferential
primary election that is held in March under § 7-7-203.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 7-7-304(b)(1), concerning the names to be
included on the ballots in a preferential primary, is amended to read as
follows:
(b)(1) The county clerk shall certify to the county board of election
commissioners full lists of the names of all candidates who have filed party
certificates with him or her to be placed on the ballot at the preferential
primary election not less than:
(A) Seventy-five (75) days before a preferential primary
election that is held in May under § 7-7-203; and
(B) Ninety-two ninety-two (92) days before a preferential
primary election that is held in March under § 7-7-203.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 7-7-305(b)(1), concerning the printing of
03-12-2025 10:10:46 SSS199

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/12/25 SB353
ballots and draw for ballot position, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) The order in which the names of the respective candidates are
to appear on the ballots at all preferential and general primary elections
shall be determined by lot at the public meeting of the county board of
election commissioners held not later than:
(A) Seventy-two (72) days before a preferential primary
election that is held in May under § 7-7-203; and
(B) Eighty-nine eighty-nine (89) days before a
preferential primary election that is held in March under § 7-7-203.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 7-11-205(a), concerning dates of special
elections on measures and questions, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section,
all special elections on measures or questions referred to the voters by
governmental entities as authorized by law shall be held on the second
Tuesday of:
(A) First Tuesday after the first Monday in March or
November in a year when a presidential election is held; and or
(B) May or Second Tuesday of November of all other years.
(2)(A) Special elections scheduled to occur in a month in which
the second Tuesday is on a legal holiday:
(i) In March on the first Tuesday after the first
Monday shall be held on the second Tuesday of the month; and
(ii) In November on the second Tuesday shall be held
on the third Tuesday of the month.
(B) Special elections held in months in which a
preferential primary election or general election is scheduled to occur shall
be held on the date of the preferential primary election or general election.
(C) A special election on a measure or question may be
scheduled on the second Tuesday of a month, other than the months provided in
subdivision (a)(1) of this section, if necessary to comply with the
requirements of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 1.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 10-2-101(b)(1), concerning the time for
meeting by the General Assembly in fiscal session, is amended to read as
follows:
03-12-2025 10:10:46 SSS199

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/12/25 SB353
(b)(1) The General Assembly shall meet in a fiscal session to consider
appropriation bills in each even-numbered year at 12:00 noon on the:
(A) Second Monday in February in years in which the
preferential primary election is held in May under § 7-7-203; and
(B) Second second Wednesday in April in years in which the
preferential primary election is held in March under § 7-7-203.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 10-2-112(a)(1), concerning the prefiling
of bills and resolutions, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) The Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives and the
Secretary of the Senate, under the direction and supervision of the Speaker
of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate,
shall establish a system for the prefiling of bills and resolutions beginning
on:
(A) November 15 of each year preceding a regular session
of the General Assembly; and
(B) The second Monday of January of each year of a fiscal
session of the General Assembly which is held in a year in which the
preferential primary election is held in May under § 7-7-203; and
(C) The second Monday of March of each year of a fiscal
session of the General Assembly which is held in a year in which the
preferential primary election is held in March under § 7-7-203.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 10-3-2104(d)(3), concerning reports under
the Continuing Advocacy Evaluation Act of 2004, is amended to read as
follows:
(3) If the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee
on Education find that the recommendations in the most recent adequacy
evaluation report filed under this section should be amended, the House
Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education, jointly or
separately, or both, shall advise in writing the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives of their findings and
amendments to the adequacy evaluation report:
(A) By November 1 of the calendar year before the
beginning of a fiscal session that is held in a year in which the
preferential primary election is held in May under § 7-7-203; and
03-12-2025 10:10:46 SSS199

As Engrossed: S3/10/25 S3/12/25 SB353
(B) By by March 1 of the calendar year before the
beginning of a fiscal session that is held in a year in which the
preferential primary election is held in March under § 7-7-203.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 19-4-304(b), concerning regular and fiscal
session preparations, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The secretary shall submit the annual revenue forecast to the
Legislative Council:
(1) By December 1 of the year preceding a fiscal session that is
held in a year in which the preferential primary election will be held in May
under § 7-7-203;
(2) By February 1 of a year preceding a fiscal session that is
held in a year in which the preferential primary election is held in March
under § 7-7-203; and
(3)(2) No later than sixty (60) days before the start of a
regular session.

/s/Hester


















03-12-2025 10:10:46 SSS199